Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4413.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-5-131 of Title 27A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section, the term "hospital, medical, or
infectious waste" means hospital waste or medical/infectious waste
as those terms are defined in 40 C.F.R., Section 60.51c, as in
effect on the effective date of this act.
B. Any facility that does not meet the current standards,
emission limitations, operating requirements, and monitoring,
reporting, and permitting requirements applicable to medical waste
incinerators promulgated by the United States Environmental
Req. No. 16399 Page 1

Prot ection Agency shall be prohibited from burning hospital or
medical/infectious waste in this state.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16399 JL 02/16/26



















Req. No. 16399 Page 2